North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116D. Higher Education Bonds.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 116D-1.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Chapter:

Board of Governors. — The Board of Governors of the University.

Capital facility. — Any one or more of the following for the University or for a community college:

One or more buildings, utilities, structures, or other facilities or property developments, including streets and landscaping, and the acquisition of equipment and furnishings in connection therewith.

Additions, extensions, enlargements, renovations, and improvements to existing buildings, utilities, structures, or other facilities or property developments, including streets and landscaping.

Land or an interest in land.

Other infrastructure.

The term includes, without limitation, classroom buildings, laboratory buildings, research facilities, libraries, physical education facilities, continuing education centers, student cafeterias, and activity facilities, including sports facilities, student and faculty housing facilities, and administrative office facilities.

Cost. — Any of the following in financing the cost of capital facilities and special obligation bond projects, as authorized by this Chapter:

The cost of constructing, reconstructing, renovating, repairing, enlarging, acquiring, and improving capital facilities and special obligation bond projects, including the acquisition of land, rights-of-way, easements, franchises, equipment, furnishings, and other interests in real or personal property acquired or used in connection with a capital facility or special obligation bond project.

The cost of engineering, architectural, and other consulting services as may be required.

The cost of providing personnel to ensure effective project management.

Finance charges, reserves for debt service, and interest prior to and during construction.

Administrative expenses and charges incurred by the State in connection with the administration of a bond program created under this Chapter.

The cost of bond insurance, investment contracts, credit enhancement, and liquidity facilities, interest-rate swap agreements or other derivative products, financial and legal consultants, and related costs of bond and note issuance.

The cost of reimbursing the State for any payments made for any cost described in this subdivision.

Any other costs and expenses necessary or incidental to the purposes of this Chapter.

Credit facility. — An agreement entered into by the State Treasurer on behalf of the State with a bank, savings and loan association or other banking institution, an insurance company, reinsurance company, surety company or other insurance institution, a corporation, investment banking firm or other investment institution, or any financial institution or other similar provider of a credit facility, which provider may be located within or without the United States, and providing for prompt payment of all or any part of the principal or purchase price (whether at maturity, presentment or tender for purchase, redemption or acceleration), redemption premium, if any, and interest on any bonds or notes payable on demand or tender by the owner, in consideration of the State’s agreeing to repay the provider of the credit facility in accordance with the terms and provisions of the agreement.

Fiscal period. — A fiscal biennium or a fiscal year of the fiscal biennium.

Fiscal year. — The fiscal year of the State beginning on July 1 of one calendar year and ending on June 30 of the next calendar year.

Par formula. — A provision or formula adopted by the State to provide for the adjustment, from time to time, of the interest rate or rates borne or provided for by any bonds or notes, including:

A provision providing for an adjustment so that the purchase price of bonds or notes in the open market would be as close to par as possible.

A provision providing for an adjustment based upon a percentage or percentages of a prime rate or base rate, which percentages may vary or be applied for different periods of time.

A provision that the State Treasurer determines is consistent with this Chapter and will not materially and adversely affect the financial position of the State and the marketing of bonds or notes at a reasonable interest cost to the State.

Securities issued under this Chapter. — Any of the following:

University improvement general obligation bonds, refunding bonds, notes, and refunding notes issued under Article 2 of this Chapter.

Special obligation bonds, bond anticipation notes, and refunding bonds issued under Article 3 of this Chapter.

Community college general obligation bonds, refunding bonds, notes, and refunding notes issued under Article 4 of this Chapter.

State. — The State of North Carolina.

State Treasurer. — The incumbent Treasurer, from time to time, of the State.

University. — The University of North Carolina and its constituent and affiliated institutions, including, without limitation, the University of North Carolina Center for Public Media, the University of North Carolina Health Care System, the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics, and the North Carolina Arboretum.

History.

2000-3, s. 1.2; 2019-139, s. 2.1(c).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2000-3, s. 2, as amended by Session Laws 2001-424, s. 31.9, Session Laws 2002-126, s. 9.3, Session Laws 2003-284, s. 9.3, Session Laws 2004-124, s. 9.4, Session Laws 2006-146, ss. 3.1-3.3, Session Laws 2007-394, ss. 8 and 9, and by Session Laws 2008-204, s. 2, makes provisions for the proceeds of the University Improvement General Obligation Bonds, and Session Laws 2000-3, s. 3, makes provisions for proceeds of Community College General Obligation Bonds.
See Editor’s notes at

G.S. 116D-6

and 116D-41.

Session Laws 2000-3, s. 5(a) through (c), provides:

“Interpretation of Act.

“(a) Additional Method. This act provides an additional and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized by this act and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws. Except where expressly provided, this act shall not be regarded as in derogation of any powers now existing. The authority granted in this act is in addition to other laws now or hereinafter enacted authorizing The University of North Carolina to issue self-liquidating debt or other debt secured by designated sources of funds.”

“(b) Statutory References. References in this act to specific sections or Chapters of the General Statutes are intended to be references to those sections or Chapters as they may be amended from time to time by the General Assembly.

“(c) Liberal Construction. This act, being necessary for the health and welfare of the people of the State, shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.”

Session Laws 2000-3, s. 5(d), is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2000-3, s. 10, provides that the question of the issuance of the bonds authorized by Articles 2 and 4 of Chapter 116D of the General Statutes, as enacted by the act, and authorized by Sections 2 and 3 of the act, shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the State at the statewide general election to be held in November 2000, which election shall be conducted under the laws governing elections.
Ballots, voting systems authorized by Article 14 of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, or both may be used in accordance with rules prescribed by the State Board of Elections. The bond question to be used in the ballots or voting systems shall be in substantially the following form:

[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST

the issuance of State of North Carolina Higher Education Improvement Bonds, constituting general obligation bonds of the State secured by a pledge of the faith and credit and taxing power of the State for the purpose of providing funds, with any other available funds, to pay all or part of the cost of (i) renovating laboratories, classrooms, academic buildings, and worker training facilities and providing other capital improvements at the 59 institutions of the North Carolina Community College System in order to fulfill the mission of educating students and providing worker training essential to the North Carolina economy, and to address expected large increases in student enrollment, and (ii) renovating and replacing classrooms, laboratories, and academic buildings and providing other capital improvements at the 16 campuses of the constituent institutions, the affiliated institutions, and the Center for Public Television (UNC-TV) of the University of North Carolina System in order to meet large expected student enrollment increases, serve North Carolina by providing the education critical to the State’s economy, and continue to provide UNC-TV public television to the State’s viewers; in the amount of three billion one hundred million dollars ($3,100,000,000).

The section further provides that if a majority of those voting on the bond question in the election vote in favor of the issuance of the bonds, the bonds may be issued as provided in this act, and if a majority of those voting on the bond question in the election do not vote for the issuance of the bonds, the bonds shall not be issued.
The results of the election shall be canvassed and declared as provided by law for elections for State officers; the results of the election shall be certified by the State Board of Elections to the Secretary of State, in the manner and at the time provided by the general election laws of the State. According to the Revisor of Statutes, the bond was approved on November 7, 2000.

Session Laws 2000-3, s. 6, had duplicate text with Session Laws 2000-3, s. 1.1(2), which was codified as G.S. 116-13.1(a)(2). The reporting requirements were deleted by Session Laws 2012-142, s. 9.4(f).

Session Laws 2001-424, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2001.’ ”

Session Laws 2001-424, s. 36.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws 2001-424, s. 36.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2002-126, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations, Capital Improvements, and Finance Act of 2002’.”

Session Laws 2002-126, s. 31.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2002-2003 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2002-2003 fiscal year. For example, uncodified provisions of this act relating to the Medicaid program apply only to the 2002-2003 fiscal year.”

Session Laws 2002-126, s. 31.6, is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2003-284, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2003’.”

Session Laws 2003-284, s. 49.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws 2003-284, s. 49.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2008-204, ss. 1.1 through 1.9, authorizes construction of specified improvement projects at University of North Carolina constituent institutions and the funding therefore.

Session Laws 2008-204, s. 1.6, provides: “With respect to the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill’s Research Resource Facility — Phase III capital project, East Carolina University’s Athletic Facilities Expansion and Improvements capital project, and North Carolina State University’s Avent Ferry Administration Center Renovation capital project, the institution may accomplish construction and financing notwithstanding the requirement in G.S. 116D-22(5) as to location at the institution.”

Session Laws 2008-204, s. 1.9, provides: “With respect to the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill’s Cogeneration and Steam Infrastructure Improvements and Expansion capital project, the institution may accomplish the construction and financing of the Landfill Gas Utilization portion thereof notwithstanding the requirement in G.S. 116D-22(5) as to location of the special obligation project at the institution. The University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill may enter into any other required agreements as necessary for the completion of the improvements, notwithstanding any other provisions of the General Statutes governing such acquisition, negotiation, and execution of such rights-of-way, easements, leases, or other required agreements therefor.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2019-139, s. 2.1(c), effective July 19, 2019, substituted “Media” for “Television” in subdivision (11).

§ 116D-2.
General provisions.

Signatures. — Should any officer whose signature or facsimile signature appears on securities issued under this Chapter cease to be that officer before the delivery of the securities, the signature or facsimile signature shall nevertheless have the same validity for all purposes as if the officer had remained in office until delivery of the securities. Securities issued under this Chapter may bear the facsimile signatures of persons, who at the actual time of the execution of the securities were the proper officers to sign any security although at the date of the security those persons may not have been officers.

Tax Exemption. — Securities issued under this Chapter shall at all times be free from taxation by the State or any political subdivision or any of their agencies, excepting estate, inheritance, or gift taxes, income taxes on the gain from the transfer of the securities, and franchise taxes. The interest on the securities is not subject to taxation as income.

Investment Eligibility. — Securities issued under this Chapter are securities in which all of the following may invest, including capital in their control or belonging to them: public officers, agencies, and public bodies of the State and its political subdivisions, insurance companies, trust companies, investment companies, banks, savings banks, savings and loan associations, credit unions, pension or retirement funds, other financial institutions engaged in business in the State, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries. Securities issued under this Chapter are securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any officer or agency of the State or a political subdivision of the State for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or notes of the State or any political subdivision is now or may later be authorized by law.

Inconsistent Laws. — All general, special, or local laws that are inconsistent with this Chapter do not apply to this Chapter.

History.

2000-3, s. 1.2.

§ 116D-3.
Reports.

Board of Governors. — The Board of Governors shall report to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations by September 15 of each year, and more frequently as the Commission requests, on the following:

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-142, s. 9.4(c), effective July 1, 2012.

Special Obligation Bonds. — The Board of Governors shall report on special obligation bonds issued under Article 3 of this Chapter, including the amount of debt, itemized for each institution of the University, by bond issue, and by project. The report shall include schedules of debt service requirements and actual payments, as well as evidence of compliance with additional financial covenants required by bond documents. The report shall identify the trends and current revenue streams of the sources of obligated resources pledged for each bond issue.

Treasurer. — Upon issuance of university improvement general obligation bonds under Article 2 of this Chapter or community college general obligation bonds under Article 4 of this Chapter, the Treasurer shall forward a schedule of required payments of principal and interest over the life of the bonds to the Director of the Budget, with copies to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations and the Fiscal Research Division.

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-142, s. 8.3(b), effective July 1, 2012.

History.

2000-3, s. 1.2; 2012-142, ss. 8.3(b), 9.4(c); 2021-60, s. 1.2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-142, ss. 8.3(b) and 9.4(c), effective July 1, 2012, repealed subsection (c) which pertained to “Community Colleges”; and repealed subdivision (a)(1) which pertained to “University Improvement General Obligation Bonds.”

Session Laws 2021-60, s. 1.2, effective July 1, 2021, deleted the last sentence of subsection (b) which read: “The Treasurer shall report to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations by September 15 of each year, and more frequently as the Commission requests, on the university improvement general obligation bonds issued under Article 2 of this Chapter and community college general obligation bonds issued under Article 4 of this Chapter, including the annual debt service requirements over the remainder of the life of the bonds.”

§ 116D-4.
Minority and historically underutilized business participation.

Minority Business Participation. — The goals set by

G.S. 143-128

for participation in projects by minority businesses apply to projects funded by the proceeds of bonds or notes issued under this section. The following State agencies shall monitor compliance with this requirement and shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government by January 1 of each year on the participation by minority businesses in these projects. The State Construction Office, Department of Administration, shall monitor compliance with regard to projects funded by the proceeds of university improvement general obligation bonds and notes and special obligation bonds and notes; the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall provide the State Construction Office any information required by the State Construction Office to monitor compliance. The Community Colleges System Office shall monitor compliance with regard to projects funded by the proceeds of community college general obligation bonds and notes.

[Participation in Providing Professional Services.] — The Department of State Treasurer shall provide contracting opportunities for historically underutilized businesses in providing professional services in connection with the issuance of bonds and notes authorized by this section. As used in this subsection, the term “historically underutilized business” means a business described in

G.S. 143-48

. The Department of State Treasurer shall strive to increase the amount of legal, financial, and other professional services acquired by it from historically underutilized businesses. With the assistance of the Office for Historically Underutilized Businesses in the Department of Administration, the Department of State Treasurer shall set objectives for contracting with these businesses, identify and eliminate barriers or constraints that may restrict these businesses from contracting with the Department, and develop a plan for meeting its objectives. The Department of State Treasurer shall report quarterly to the Office for Historically Underutilized Businesses on its progress in carrying out the requirements of this subsection.

History.

2000-3, s. 7(a), (b); 2001-487, s. 26; 2021-180, s. 37.1(a).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws
2000-3, s. 7(a) and (b), was codified as this section and the bracketed text inserted at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 37.13, made the amendments to subsection (a) of this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 37.1(a), effective November 18, 2021, and applicable to reports submitted on or after that date.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 37.1(a), in the second sentence of subsection (a), substituted “Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government” for “General Assembly.” For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.”

§ 116D-5.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-43, s. 1, effective April 19, 2011.

History.

2000-3, s. 4(a)-(h); 2008-84, ss. 1, 2; repealed by 2011-43, s. 1, effective April 19, 2011.

Editor’s Note.

Former

G.S. 116D-5

pertained to higher education bond oversight committee.

Session Laws 2000-3, s. 4(a)-(h), was codified as this section and internal references changed at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2008-84, s. 1 and 2, effective July 11, 2008, substituted “annually” for “semiannually” in subsection (d); substituted “twice a year” for “once a quarter” in the second sentence of subsection (e).